Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.120

Utilities—Facilities for generation of electricity.

Any code city owning and operating a public utility and having facilities and/or land for the generation of electricity shall be governed by the provisions of RCW 35.21.420 through 35.21.450.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.120.]